Maine, session 132, LD1165.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA c. 727 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 727
VEHICLE FLUIDS DISPOSAL FEE
§4961. Fee imposed
A fee is imposed on the retail sale in this State of new automobiles in the amount of
$100 per automobile. For purposes of this section, "automobile" has the same meaning as
in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 7.
§4962. Administration
The fee imposed by this chapter is administered as provided in chapter 7 and Part 3,
and for purposes of administration, the fee imposed pursuant to this chapter must be
considered imposed under Part 3.
The revenue derived from the fee imposed by this chapter must be deposited in the
Vehicle Fluid Waste Fund established under Title 38, section 2147, subsection 1. The fund
must reimburse the General Fund for the administrative costs of the fee as certified by the
bureau.
§4963. Application
This chapter applies to purchases made in this State on or after January 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §2147 is enacted to read:
§2147. Vehicle Fluid Waste Fund
1. Vehicle Fluid Waste Fund established. The Vehicle Fluid Waste Fund, referred to
in this section as "the fund," is established and administered by the Department of
Environmental Protection as an interest-bearing, nonlapsing fund to reimburse owners and
operators of automobile graveyards to properly dispose of fluids extracted from motor
vehicles deposited in the automobile graveyards and to reimburse the department for costs
in administering the fund. The fund receives fees from Title 36, chapter 727 and funds
derived from appropriations, allocations and other public or private sources. Interest
earned by investments of the fund accrue to the fund. For purposes of this section,
"automobile graveyard" has the same meaning as in Title 30-A, section 3752, subsection
1.
2. Disbursements from the fund. To the extent that funds are available, the
department shall disburse from the fund an amount the department determines adequate to
carry out the purposes of the fund. The department may reimburse a portion or all of the
costs of an owner or operator of an automobile graveyard under subsection 3, paragraph B.
3. Eligibility. An owner or operator of an automobile graveyard is eligible for
reimbursement for disposal costs of fluids extracted from a motor vehicle deposited in the
automobile graveyard if:
Page 1 - 132LR2169(01)

A. The owner or operator possesses a permit for the automobile graveyard under Title
30-A, section 3753;
B. The owner or operator provides written documentation for the costs of the proper
disposal of fluid from a motor vehicle deposited in the automobile graveyard; and
C. The owner or operator follows all requirements of the department for the proper
disposal of the fluids.
4. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.